New York, session 2025-2026, S8711.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (n) and (o) of subdivision 1 of section 353 of 2 the economic development law, paragraph (n) as amended and paragraph (o) 3 as added by section 2 of subpart A of part H of chapter 59 of the laws 4 of 2025, are amended and a new paragraph (p) is added to read as 5 follows: 6 (n) as a Green CHIPS project; [or] 7 (o) as a company operating in one of the industries listed in para- 8 graphs (a) through (k) of this subdivision and engaging in a semiconduc- 9 tor supply chain project as defined in section three hundred fifty-two 10 of this article[.]; or 11 (p) as a company operating in the industry listed in paragraph (e) of 12 this subdivision and engaging in hospitality or tourism which primarily 13 promotes the sale, marketing, production, harvesting, or use of the 14 agricultural product or any product designed for food or drink manufac- 15 tured or prepared onsite principally from an agricultural product. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13628-02-5